District of Columbia statutes.
13-447

Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it[.]

May 22, 2010, D.C. Law 18-147, § 2(b), 57 DCR 2552
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 7 of the Uniform Interstate Depositions and Discovery Act.